Wisconsin, session 2025, AB439.
do enact as follows:AB439,11Section 1. 86.31 (3o) (b) 4. of the statutes is renumbered 86.31 (3o) (b) 4. 2(intro.) and amended to read:AB439,2,4386.31 (3o) (b) 4. (intro.) The Any of the following applies to the highway under 4subd. 1. or the highway upon which the bridge or culvert under subd. 1. is located:AB439,2,65a. The highway is designated as a class “B” highway under s. 349.15 due to 6structural deficiencies or.AB439,2,87b. The highway has been subject to a posted weight limitation for at least one 8month during the previous year.AB439,29Section 2. 86.31 (3o) (b) 4. c. of the statutes is created to read:AB439,2,121086.31 (3o) (b) 4. c. An engineering analysis performed by a registered 11professional engineer indicates that the highway is unable to accommodate heavy 12agricultural traffic.AB439,2,1313